Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-1628.05
Report.

Each
local public health department shall prepare an annual report regarding the
core public health functions carried out by the department in the prior fiscal
year. The report shall be submitted to the Department of Health and Human
Services by October 1. The Department of Health and Human Services shall compile
the reports and submit the results electronically to
the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature by December 1.

Laws 2001, LB 692, § 8;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 35;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 477;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 111.